Illinois, session 104th, HB4747.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Administrative Act is amended by changing Section 64.4 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1705/4.4)8    Sec. 4.4. Direct support professional credential pilot 9program.10    (a) In this Section, "direct support professional person 11credential" means a document issued to an individual by a 12recognized accrediting body attesting that the individual has 13met the professional requirements of the credentialing program 14by the Division of Developmental Disabilities of the 15Department of Human Services.16    (b) The Division or a Division partner shall initiate a 17program to continue to gain the expertise and knowledge of the 18developmental disabilities workforce and of the developmental 19disabilities workforce recruitment and retention needs 20throughout the developmental disabilities field. The Division 21shall implement a direct support professional credential pilot 22program to assist and attract persons into the field of direct 23support, advance direct support as a career, and   HB4747 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19080 KTG 32525 b1professionalize the field to promote workforce recruitment and 2retention efforts, advanced skills and competencies, and 3further ensure the health, safety, and well-being of persons 4being served.5    (c) The direct support professional credential pilot 6program is created within the Division to assist persons in 7the field of developmental disabilities in obtaining a 8credential in their fields of expertise.9    (d) The pilot program shall be administered by the 10Division for 3 years, beginning in Fiscal Year 2028 2025. The 11pilot program shall include providers licensed and certified 12by the Division or by the Department of Public Health. The 13purpose of the pilot program is to assess how the 14establishment of a State-administered direct support 15professional credential:16        (1) promotes recruitment and retention efforts in the 17    developmental disabilities field, notably the direct 18    support professional position;19        (2) enhances competence in the developmental 20    disabilities field;21        (3) yields quality supports and services to persons 22    with developmental disabilities; and23        (4) advances the health and safety requirements set 24    forth by the State.25    (e) The Division or a Division partner, in administering 26the pilot program, shall consider, but not be limited to, the   HB4747 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19080 KTG 32525 b1following:2        (1) best practices learning initiatives, including the 3    University of Minnesota's college of direct support and 4    all Illinois Department of Human Services-approved direct 5    support professional competencies;6        (2) national direct support professional competencies 7    or credentialing-based standards and trainings;8        (3) facilitating direct support professional's 9    portfolio development;10        (4) the role and value of skill mentors; and11        (5) creating a career ladder.12    (f) The Division shall produce a report detailing the 13progress of the pilot program, including, but not limited to:14        (1) the rate of recruitment and retention for direct 15    support professionals of providers participating in the 16    pilot program compared to the rate for non-participating 17    providers;18        (2) the number of direct support professional 19    credentialed; and20        (3) the enhancement of quality supports and services 21    to persons with developmental disabilities.22(Source: P.A. 102-830, eff. 1-1-23; 103-998, eff. 8-9-24; 23revised 6-26-25.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.